fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-TA-DerXXX_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - TA verbs - adsf : # Verbal derivations

     # TA -> AI: Antip with -iwê
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Antip+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wîcihiwêw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Antip+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: niwîcihiwân
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Antip+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: ê-wîcihiwêt

     # TA -> AI: Dtr with -ikê
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Dtr+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wîcihikêw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Dtr+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: niwîcihikân
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Dtr+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: ê-wîcihikêt

     # TA -> AI: MedPass with -o
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/MedPass+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wîcihow
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/MedPass+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: niwîcihon
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/MedPass+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: ê-wîcihot

     # TA -> AI: Rflx with -iso
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Rflx+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wîcihisow
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Rflx+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: niwîcihison
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Rflx+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: ê-wîcihisot

     # TA -> AI: Rcpr with -ito
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Rcpr+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: wîcihitowak
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Rcpr+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: niwîcihitonân
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Rcpr+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: ê-wîcihitocik

     # TA -> TA: Bnf with -amaw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihamawêw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: niwîcihamawâw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+2SgO: kiwîcihamâtin
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: kiwîcihamawin
     PV/ê+wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Cnj+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: ê-wîcihamawât
     
     # Nominalizations
     # TA -> AI -> NI: MedPass with -o + Nom with -win
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/MedPass+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Sg: wîcihowin
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/MedPass+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: niwîcihowina
     # TA -> NA: Goa with -âkan
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Goa+N+A+Sg: wîcihâkan
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Goa+N+A+Px1Sg+Pl: niwîcihâkanak
     
     # Diminutives
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Dim+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihêsiw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Dim+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: niwîcihâsiw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Dim+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+1SgO: niwîcihikosi


     # Complex forms
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Caus+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihiwêhêw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Caus+V+TA+Der/Dtr+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wîcihiwêhikêw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Caus+V+TA+Der/Rflx+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wîcihiwêhisow
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Caus+V+TA+Der/Rflx+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Sg: wîcihiwêhisowin
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihiwêstawêw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Dtr+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wîcihiwêstâkêw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rcpr+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: wîcihiwêstâtowak 
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Rcpr+V+AI+Der/Nom+N+I+Pl: wîcihiwêstâtowina

     # Complex diminutives
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Antip+V+AI+Der/Dim+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wîcihiwêsiw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Dtr+V+AI+Der/Dim+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wîcihikêsiw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/MedPass+V+AI+Der/Dim+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wîcihosiw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Rflx+V+AI+Der/Dim+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: wîcihisosiw
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Rcpr+V+AI+Der/Dim+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: wîcihicosiwak
     wîcihêw+V+TA+Der/Bnf+V+TA+Der/Dim+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: wîcihamawêsiw
